California statutes. Vehicle Code
15309.

In addition to any other action taken under this code, no driver may operate a commercial motor vehicle for a period of 60 days if the department determines, after a hearing, that the person falsified information on his or her application for a driver’s license in violation of the standards set forth in subpart J of part 383 or Section 383.71(a) of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 724, Sec. 35.4.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

15309.5.

(a) It is unlawful for any person to do any of the following:

(1) Sell, offer for sale, distribute, or use a crib sheet or cribbing device, as defined in Section 273, that contains answers to any examination administered by the department for a commercial driver’s license or permit.

(2) Impersonate or allow the impersonation of an applicant for a commercial driver’s license or permit for the purpose of fraudulently qualifying the applicant for a commercial driver’s license or permit.

(3) Provide, or use, any unauthorized assistance during
 any examination administered by the department for a commercial driver’s license or permit.

(b) A first conviction under this section is punishable as either an infraction or a misdemeanor, and the driver shall not operate a commercial motor vehicle for a period of one year. A second or subsequent conviction is punishable as a misdemeanor, and the driver shall not operate a commercial motor vehicle for a period of one year.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 649, Sec. 5.   (AB 1047)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

15311.

(a) A driver shall not operate a commercial motor vehicle for a period of 180 days if the person is convicted of a first violation of an out-of-service order under subdivision (b), (c), or (d) of Section 2800.

(b) A driver shall not operate a commercial motor vehicle for a period of two years if the person is convicted of violating an out-of-service order under subdivision (b), (c), or (d) of Section 2800 while transporting hazardous materials required to be placarded or while operating a vehicle designed to transport 16 or more passengers, including the driver.

(c) A driver shall not operate a commercial motor vehicle
 for a period of two years if the person is convicted of a second violation of an out-of-service order under subdivision (b), (c), or (d) of Section 2800 during any 10-year period, arising from separate incidents.

(d) A driver shall not operate a commercial motor vehicle for a period of three years if the person is convicted of a second violation of an out-of-service order under subdivision (b), (c), or (d) of Section 2800 while transporting hazardous materials that are required to be placarded or while operating a vehicle designed to transport 16 or more passengers, including the driver.

(e) In addition to the disqualification period required in subdivision (a), (b), (c), or (d), a driver who is convicted of violating an out-of-service order under subdivision (b) of Section 2800 is subject to a civil penalty of not less than two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) for a first
 conviction, and a civil penalty of five thousand dollars ($5,000) for a second or subsequent conviction.

(f) A driver shall not operate a commercial motor vehicle for a period of three years if the person is convicted of a third or subsequent violation of an out-of-service order under subdivision (b), (c), or (d) of Section 2800 during any 10-year period, arising from separate incidents.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 216, Sec. 8.   (AB 2144)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

15311.1.

An employer that knowingly allows or requires an employee to operate a commercial motor vehicle in violation of an out-of-service order is, upon conviction, subject to a civil penalty of not less than two thousand seven hundred fifty dollars ($2,750) nor more than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 216, Sec. 9.   (AB 2144)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

15312.

A driver may not operate a commercial motor vehicle for the following periods:

(a) Not less than 60 days if that person is convicted of a violation of subdivision (a) of Section 2800, or Section 21462, 22451, or 22452, or subdivision (c) or (d) of Section 22526, involving a commercial motor vehicle and the violation occurred at a railroad-highway crossing.

(b) Not less than 120 days if that person is convicted of a violation of subdivision (a) of Section 2800, or Section 21462, 22451, or 22452, or subdivision (c) or (d) of Section 22526, involving a commercial motor vehicle, and that violation occurred at a railroad-highway crossing, during
 any three-year period of a separate, prior offense of a railroad-highway grade crossing violation, that resulted in a conviction.

(c) Not less than one year if that person is convicted of a violation of subdivision (a) of Section 2800, or Section 21462, 22451, or 22452, or subdivision (c) or (d) of Section 22526, involving a commercial motor vehicle, and that violation occurred at a railroad-highway crossing, at a railroad-highway grade crossing, during any three-year period of two or more prior offenses of a railroad-highway grade crossing violation, that resulted in convictions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 216, Sec. 10.   (AB 2144)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

15312.1.

(a) An employer that knowingly allows or requires an employee to operate a commercial motor vehicle in violation of a federal, state, or local law or regulation pertaining to railroad crossings is, upon conviction, subject to a civil penalty of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000).

(b) This section shall become operative on September 20, 2005.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 952, Sec. 25.   Effective January 1, 2005.   Section operative September 20, 2005, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

15315.

(a) The department shall not issue a commercial driver’s license to a person during a period in which the person is prohibited from operating a commercial motor vehicle, or the person’s driving privilege is suspended, revoked, or canceled.

(b) No commercial driver’s license may be issued to a person who has a commercial driver’s license issued by any other state unless the person first surrenders the commercial driver’s license issued by the other state, which license shall be returned to the issuing state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1509, Sec. 9.)
-------------------------------------------

15319.

The department may execute or make agreements, arrangements, or declarations to carry out this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1509, Sec. 9.)
-------------------------------------------

15320.

The department shall suspend, revoke, or cancel, the privilege of any person to operate a commercial motor vehicle for the periods specified in this article upon receipt of a duly certified abstract of the record of any court that the person has been convicted of any of the offenses set forth in this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 724, Sec. 37.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

15325.

(a) Pursuant to subpart D of Part 383 of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations, a driver whose driving is determined to constitute an imminent hazard is disqualified from operating a commercial motor vehicle for the period specified by the Federal Motor Carrier Safety Administration.

(b) The disqualification action shall be made part of the driver’s record.

(c) A driver who is simultaneously disqualified under this section and any other state law or regulation, shall serve those disqualification periods concurrently.

(d) This section shall become operative on September 20, 2005.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 952, Sec. 26.   Effective January 1, 2005.   Section operative September 20, 2005, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

15326.

Upon receiving notification of an administrative action or conviction of a commercial licenseholder in a state, territory, or possession of the United States, the District of Columbia, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, or the Dominion of Canada, the department shall impose a suspension, revocation, or disqualification action on that person’s commercial driving privilege based upon violations that would result in an administrative action or a conviction pursuant to Section 383.51 of Subpart D of Part 383 and Sections 384.206(b)(3), 384.213, and 384.231 of Subpart B of Part 384 of Title 49 of the Federal Code of Regulations. Those violations include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(a) Violations of Sections 15300, 15302, and 15304.

(b) Serious traffic violations, as defined in subdivision (p) of Section 15210 and subject to the penalties under Section 15306 or 15308.

(c) Providing false information under Section 15309.

(d) Out-of-service order violations under Section 15311.

(e) Railroad-highway crossing violations under Section 15312.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 670, Sec. 10.   (AB 2188)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 6.5. MOTOR VEHICLE TRANSACTIONS WITH MINORS [15500. - 15501.]



CHAPTER 1. Driver’s License Requirements [15500. - 15501.]

15500.

It is unlawful for any minor who does not possess a valid driver’s license issued under this code to order, purchase or lease, attempt to purchase or lease, contract to purchase or lease, accept, or otherwise obtain, any vehicle of a type subject to registration.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1020.)
-------------------------------------------

15501.

It is unlawful for any minor to present or offer to any person offering for sale or lease or to give or otherwise furnish thereto any motor vehicle of a type subject to registration, a driver’s license which is false, fraudulent, or not actually his own for the purpose of ordering, purchasing or leasing, attempting to purchase or lease, contracting to purchase or lease, accepting, or otherwise obtaining such a vehicle.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1020.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 6.7. UNATTENDED CHILD IN MOTOR VEHICLE SAFETY ACT [15600. - 15632.]



CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [15600. - 15603.]

15600.

This division shall be known and may be cited as “Kaitlyn’s Law.”

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 855, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

15602.

This division applies to motor vehicles upon the highways and elsewhere throughout the state unless expressly provided otherwise.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 855, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

15603.

The purpose of this division is to help prevent injuries to, and the death of, young children from the effects of being left alone in a motor vehicle, to help educate parents and caretakers about the dangers of leaving children alone in a motor vehicle, and to authorize a monetary fine to be imposed on a person for leaving a young child alone in a motor vehicle in circumstances that pose a life safety risk.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 855, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Offenses [15620. - 15620.]

15620.

(a) A parent, legal guardian, or other person responsible for a child who is 6 years of age or younger may not leave that child inside a motor vehicle without being subject to the supervision of a person who is 12 years of age or older, under either of the following circumstances:

(1) Where there are conditions that present a significant risk to the child’s health or safety.

(2) When the vehicle’s engine is running or the vehicle’s keys are in the ignition, or both.

(b) A violation of subdivision (a) is an infraction punishable by a fine of one hundred dollars ($100), except that the court may reduce or waive the fine if the defendant establishes to the satisfaction of the court that he or she is economically disadvantaged and the court, instead, refers the defendant to a community education program that includes education on the dangers of leaving young children unattended in motor vehicles, and provides certification of completion of that program. Upon completion of that program, the defendant shall provide that certification to the court. The court may, at its discretion, require any defendant described in this section to attend an education program on the dangers of leaving young children unattended in motor vehicles.

(c) Nothing in this section shall preclude prosecution under both this section and Section 192 of the Penal Code, or Section 273a of that code, or any other provision of law.

(d) (1) Subdivision (b) and Section 40000.1 do not apply if an unattended child is injured or medical services are rendered on that child because of a violation described in subdivision (a).

(2) Nothing in this subdivision precludes prosecution under any other provision of law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 664, Sec. 222.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Educational Provisions [15630. - 15632.]

15630.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the fines collected for a violation of this division shall be allocated by the county treasurer, as follows:

(a) (1) Seventy percent to the county or city health department where the violation occurred, to be used for the development and implementation of community education programs on the dangers of leaving young children unattended in motor vehicles.

(2) A county or city health department may develop and implement the community education program described in paragraph (1) or may contract for the development and implementation of that program.

(3) As the proceeds from fines collected under this division become available, each county or city health department shall prepare and annually update a listing of community education programs that provide information on the dangers of leaving young children unattended in motor vehicles and ways to avoid that danger. The county or city health department shall forward the listing to the courts and shall make the listing available to the public, and may distribute it to other agencies or organizations.

(b) Fifteen percent to the county or city for the administration of the program, from which will be paid the cost of the county to account for and disburse fine revenues.

(c) Fifteen percent to the city, to be deposited in its general fund except that, if the violation occurred in an unincorporated area, this amount shall be deposited in the county’s general fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 855, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

15632.

(a) The department shall include information concerning the dangers of leaving children unattended in motor vehicles, including, but not limited to, the effect of solar heat on the temperature of vehicle interiors and the penalties for noncompliance with Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 15620), in the following materials distributed by the department:

(1) The California Driver’s Handbook published under Section 1656.

(2) The driver’s license examination administered under Section 12804.9, by including, on a rotating basis, at least one question in one version of the driver’s license examination that is periodically administered to applicants.

(3) Any driver’s education materials certified by the department.

(4) Courses and examinations for traffic violator schools.

(5) Materials provided to secondary and postsecondary schools and educational institutions.

(6) Any materials provided to community education campaigns undertaken by the department and other state agencies, including, but not limited to, the Department of the California Highway Patrol and the Department of Transportation.

(b) The department shall not republish materials before existing supplies are exhausted, but shall arrange for compliance with this section in the next edition or publication of those materials in the normal course of business.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 254, Sec. 9.   (AB 174)   Effective September 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 7. FINANCIAL RESPONSIBILITY LAWS [16000. - 16560.]



CHAPTER 1. Compulsory Financial Responsibility [16000. - 16078.]



  ARTICLE 1. Accident Reports [16000. - 16005.]

16000.

(a) The driver of a motor vehicle who is in any manner involved in an accident originating from the operation of the motor vehicle on a street or highway, or is involved in a reportable off-highway accident, as defined in Section 16000.1, that has resulted in damage to the property of any one person in excess of one thousand dollars ($1,000), or in bodily injury, or in the death of any person shall report the accident, within 10 days after the accident, either personally or through an insurance agent, broker, or legal representative, on a form approved by the department, to the office of the department at Sacramento, subject to this chapter. The driver shall identify on the form, by name and current residence address, if available, any person
 involved in the accident complaining of bodily injury.

(b) A report is not required under subdivision (a) if the motor vehicle involved in the accident was owned or leased by, or under the direction of, the United States, this state, another state, or a local agency.

(c) If none of the parties involved in an accident has reported the accident to the department under this section within one year following the date of the accident, the department is not required to file a report on the accident and the driver’s license suspension requirements of Section 16004 or 16070 do not apply.

(d) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2017.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 28) and added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 451, Sec. 29.   (SB 491)   Effective January 1, 2016.   Section operative January 1, 2017, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

16000.1.

(a) For purposes of this division, a “reportable off-highway accident” means an accident that includes all of the following:

(1) Occurs off the street or highway.

(2) Involves a vehicle that is subject to registration under this code.

(3) Results in damages to the property of any one person in excess of one thousand dollars ($1,000) or in bodily injury or in the death of any person.

(b) A “reportable off-highway accident” does not include any accident that occurs off-highway in which damage
 occurs only to the property of the driver or owner of the motor vehicle and no bodily injury or death of a person occurs.

(c) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2017.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 30) and added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 451, Sec. 31.   (SB 491)   Effective January 1, 2016.   Section operative January 1, 2017, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

16000.7.

As used in this division an “uninsured motor vehicle” is a motor vehicle for which financial responsibility as provided in Section 16021 was not in effect at the time of the accident.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 549.)
-------------------------------------------

16000.8.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, if the failure of the driver of a motor vehicle involved in an accident to prove the existence of financial responsibility, as required by Section 16020, was due to the fraudulent acts of an insurance agent or broker, the department shall terminate any suspension action taken pursuant to Section 16070, when both of the following conditions are met:

(1) The driver provides documentation from the Department of Insurance that the insurance agent or broker has been found to have committed fraud in the transaction of automobile liability insurance, or provides documentation that criminal charges have been filed against the agent or broker due to fraud or theft related to the sale of automobile liability insurances.

(2) The driver furnishes proof to the department that financial responsibility meeting the requirements of Section 16021 is currently in effect.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this section that individuals who are the victims of insurance fraud not be penalized for violating the financial responsibility laws when that violation was due to the fraudulent acts of others. Persons with documented evidence of fraud involving their insurance coverage, such as where an insurance agent accepted the premium payment for coverage but willfully failed to obtain the coverage and led the customer to believe insurance was in effect, should retain their driving privileges provided they give evidence that valid liability insurance is currently in effect.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1155, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

16001.

If the vehicle involved was a driverless runaway vehicle and was parked with the express or implied permission of the registered owner, the registered owner of the vehicle shall be construed to have been the driver of the vehicle for the purposes of this chapter.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1409.)
-------------------------------------------

16002.

(a) If the driver at the time of the accident was driving a motor vehicle owned, operated, or leased by the employer of the driver and with the permission of the employer, then the driver shall within five days after the accident report the accident to his employer on a form approved by the employer. Within 10 days after receipt of the report the employer shall transmit a report on a form approved by the department to the office of the department at Sacramento, except that an employer need not transmit such report when the vehicle involved in the accident is owned or operated as described in Section 16051 or 16052, or is owned or operated by any person or corporation who has filed with the department a certificate of an insurance carrier or surety company that there is in effect a policy or bond meeting the requirements of Section 16056 and when such policy or bond is in force with respect to the vehicle at the time of the accident.

(b) The driver of a vehicle that is owned or operated by a publicly owned or operated transit system, or that is operated under contract with a publicly owned or operated transit system, and that is used to provide regularly scheduled transportation to the general public or for other official business of the system shall, within 10 days of the occurrence of the accident, report to the transit system any accident of a type otherwise required to be reported pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 16000. The transit system shall maintain records of any report filed pursuant to this paragraph. Within 10 days after receipt of the report, the transit system shall transmit a report on a form approved by the department to the office of the department in Sacramento, except that a transit system is not required to submit a report when the vehicle involved in the accident is owned or operated as described in subdivision (b) of Section 16000.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 84, first Sec. 2.   Effective July 19, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

16003.

If any driver is physically incapable of making the report, and is not the owner of the motor vehicle involved in the accident, the owner shall, as soon as he learns of the accident, report the matter in writing to the department.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1409.)
-------------------------------------------

16004.

(a) The department shall suspend the driving privilege of any person who fails, refuses, or neglects to make a report of an accident as required in this chapter.

(b) A suspension taken under this section shall remain in effect until terminated by receipt of the report of the accident or upon receipt of evidence that financial responsibility as provided in Section 16021 is in effect.

(c) The driving privilege shall not be suspended under this section, and, if a suspension has been imposed and is in effect under this section, that suspension shall be terminated, if the driving privilege is suspended under Section 16370 or 16381 as the result of a judgment arising out of the same accident for which the report of the accident is required by this section. The department may suspend or reimpose the suspension of the driving privilege of a person under this section if the suspension under Section 16370 or 16381 is later set aside for a reason other than that the person has satisfied the judgment in full or to the extent provided in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 16250) and has given proof of financial responsibility, as provided in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 16430).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 314, Sec. 3.   Effective July 17, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

16005.

(a) All reports and supplemental reports required by this chapter including insurance information forms shall be without prejudice to the individual so reporting and shall be for the confidential use of the department and any other state department requiring such information, except that the department shall upon request disclose from the reports:

(1) The names and addresses of persons involved in the accident.

(2) The registration numbers and descriptions of vehicles involved in the accident.

(3) The date, time, and location of the accident.

(4) Any suspension action taken by the department.

(5) The names and addresses of insurers.

(b) The information specified in subdivision (a) may be given to any person having a proper interest therein, including:

(1) The driver or drivers involved, or the employer, parent, or legal guardian thereof.

(2) The authorized representative of any person involved in the accident.

(3) Any person injured in the accident.

(4) The owners of vehicles or property damaged in the accident.

(5) Any law enforcement agency.

(6) Any court of competent jurisdiction.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1409.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Financial Responsibility [16020. - 16033.]

16020.

(a) All drivers and all owners of a motor vehicle shall at all times be able to establish financial responsibility pursuant to Section 16021, and shall at all times carry in the vehicle evidence of the form of financial responsibility in effect for the vehicle.

(b) “Evidence of financial responsibility” means any of the following:

(1) A form issued by an insurance company or charitable risk pool, as specified by the department pursuant to Section 4000.37.

(2) If the owner is a self-insurer, as provided in Section 16052 or a
 depositor, as provided in Section 16054.2, the certificate of
 self-insurance or the assignment of deposit letter issued by the department.

(3) An insurance covering note or binder pursuant to Section 382 or 382.5 of the Insurance Code.

(4) A showing that the vehicle is owned or leased by, or under the direction of, the United States or a public entity, as defined in Section 811.2 of the Government Code.

(c) For purposes of this section, “evidence of financial responsibility” also may be obtained by a law enforcement officer and court personnel from an electronic reporting system when that system becomes available for use by law enforcement officers.

(d) For purposes of this section, “evidence of financial responsibility”
 also includes any of the following:

(1) The name of the insurance company and the number of an insurance policy or surety bond that was in effect at the time of the accident or at the time that evidence of financial responsibility is required to be provided pursuant to Section 16028, if that information is contained in the vehicle registration records of the department.

(2) The identifying motor carrier of property permit number issued by the Department of the California Highway Patrol to the motor carrier of property as defined in Section 34601, and displayed on the motor vehicle in the manner specified by the Department of the California Highway Patrol.

(3) The identifying number issued to the household mover by
 the Bureau of Household Goods and Services and displayed on the motor vehicle in the manner specified by the bureau or an identifying number issued to the passenger stage carrier or transportation charter party carrier by the Public Utilities Commission and displayed on the motor vehicle in the manner specified by the commission.

(e) Evidence of financial responsibility does not include an identification number in paragraph (1), (2), or (3) of subdivision (d) if the carrier is currently suspended by the issuing agency for lack or lapse of insurance or other form of financial responsibility.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 295, Sec. 13.   (AB 2956)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

16020.3.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any employer that owns a vanpool vehicle, as described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 17149 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, shall maintain evidence of financial responsibility with respect to that vehicle in the same form and amount as described in Section 5391.2 of the Public Utilities Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 622, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

16021.

Financial responsibility of the driver or owner is established if the driver or owner of the vehicle involved in an accident described in Section 16000 is:

(a) A self-insurer under the provisions of this division.

(b) An insured or obligee under a form of insurance or bond that complies with the requirements of this division and that covers the driver for the vehicle involved in the accident.

(c) The United States of America, this state, any municipality or subdivision thereof, or the lawful agent thereof.

(d) A depositor in compliance with subdivision (a) of Section 16054.2.

(e) An obligee under a policy issued by a charitable risk pool that complies with subdivision (b) of Section 16054.2.

(f) In compliance with the requirements authorized by the department by any other manner which effectuates the purposes of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 594, Sec. 41.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

16025.

(a) Every driver involved in the accident shall, unless rendered incapable, exchange with any other driver or property owner involved in the accident and present at the scene, all of the following information:

(1) Driver’s name and current residence address, driver’s license number, vehicle identification number, and current residence address of registered owner.

(2) Evidence of financial responsibility, as specified in Section 16020. If the financial responsibility of a person is a form of insurance, then that person shall supply the name and address of the insurance company and the number of the insurance policy.

(b) Any person failing to comply with all of the requirements of this section is guilty of an infraction punishable by a fine not to exceed two hundred fifty dollars ($250).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 880, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

16027.

(a) Whenever proof of financial responsibility has been established under subdivision (a) of Section 16054.2 and a period of four years has elapsed following the effective date of the suspension, the cash deposit, or any balance thereof remaining, shall be refunded to the person entitled thereto, if the director is satisfied that there are no outstanding or pending claims against the deposit.

(b) If the deposit, or any balance thereof, is refundable under this section but remains unclaimed by the depositor or any other person entitled thereto for a period of six years from the effective date of the suspension, the unclaimed deposit shall be transferred to the Motor Vehicle Account in the State Transportation Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 619, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

16028.

(a) Upon the demand of a peace officer pursuant to subdivision (b) or upon the demand of a peace officer or traffic collision investigator pursuant to subdivision (c), every person who drives a motor vehicle upon a highway shall provide evidence of financial responsibility for the vehicle that is in effect at the time the demand is made. The evidence of financial responsibility may be provided using a mobile electronic device. However, a peace officer shall not stop a vehicle for the sole purpose of determining whether the vehicle is being driven in violation of this subdivision.

(b) If a notice to appear is issued for any alleged violation of this code, except a violation specified
 in Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 22500) of Division 11 or any local ordinance adopted pursuant to that chapter, the cited driver shall furnish written evidence of financial responsibility or may provide electronic verification of evidence of financial responsibility using a mobile electronic device upon request of the peace officer issuing the citation. The peace officer shall request and verify the driver’s evidence of financial responsibility, as specified in Section 16020. If the driver fails to provide evidence of financial responsibility at the time the notice to appear is issued, the peace officer may issue the driver a notice to appear for violation of subdivision (a). The notice to appear for violation of subdivision (a) shall be written on the same citation form as the original violation.

(c) If a peace officer, or a regularly
 employed and salaried employee of a city or county who has been trained as a traffic collision investigator, is summoned to the scene of an accident described in Section 16000, the driver of a motor vehicle that is in any manner involved in the accident shall furnish written evidence of financial responsibility or may provide electronic verification of evidence of financial responsibility using a mobile electronic device upon the request of the peace officer or traffic collision investigator. If the driver fails to provide evidence of financial responsibility when requested, the peace officer may issue the driver a notice to appear for violation of subdivision (a). A traffic collision investigator may cause a notice to appear to be issued for a violation of subdivision (a), upon review of that citation by a peace officer.

(d) (1) If, at the time a notice to appear for a violation of subdivision (a) is issued, the person is driving a motor vehicle owned or leased by the driver’s employer, and the vehicle is being driven with the permission of the employer, this section shall apply to the employer rather than the driver. In that case, a notice to appear shall be issued to the employer rather than the driver, and the driver may sign the notice on behalf of the employer.

(2) The driver shall notify the employer of the receipt of the notice issued pursuant to paragraph (1) not later than five days after receipt.

(e) A person issued a notice to appear for a violation of subdivision (a) may personally appear before the clerk of the court, as designated in the notice to appear,
 and provide written evidence of financial responsibility in a form consistent with Section 16020, showing that the driver was in compliance with that section at the time the notice to appear for violating subdivision (a) was issued. In lieu of the personal appearance, the person may submit by mail to the court written evidence of having had financial responsibility at the time the notice to appear was issued. Upon receipt by the clerk of that written evidence of financial responsibility in a form consistent with Section 16020, further proceedings on the notice to appear for the violation of subdivision (a) shall be dismissed.

(f) For the purposes of this section, “mobile electronic device” means a portable computing and communication device that has a display screen with touch input or a miniature keyboard.

(g) For the purposes of this section, when a person provides evidence of financial responsibility using a mobile electronic device to a peace officer, the peace officer shall only view the evidence of financial responsibility and is prohibited from viewing any other content on the mobile electronic device.

(h) If a person presents a mobile electronic device pursuant to this section, that person assumes all liability for any damage to the mobile electronic device.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 295, Sec. 14.   (AB 2956)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

16029.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a violation of subdivision (a) of Section 16028 is an infraction and shall be punished as follows:

(a) Upon a first conviction, by a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) and not more than two hundred dollars ($200), plus penalty assessments.

(b) Upon a subsequent conviction, occurring within three years of a prior conviction, by a fine of not less than two hundred dollars ($200) and not more than five hundred dollars ($500), plus penalty assessments.

(c) (1) At the discretion of the court, for good cause, and in addition to the penalties specified in subdivisions (a) and (b), the court may order the impoundment of the vehicle for which the owner could not produce evidence of financial responsibility in violation of subdivision (a) of Section 16028.

(2) A vehicle impounded pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be released to the legal owner of the vehicle or the legal owner’s agent if all of the following conditions are met:

(A) The legal owner is a motor vehicle dealer, bank, credit union, acceptance corporation, or other licensed financial institution legally operating in this state.

(B) The legal owner or the legal owner’s agent pays all towing and storage fees related to the seizure of the vehicle.

(C) The legal owner or the legal owner’s agent presents foreclosure documents or an affidavit of repossession for the vehicle.

(3) (A) A legal owner or the legal owner’s agent that obtains release of the vehicle pursuant to paragraph (2) shall not release the vehicle to the registered owner of the vehicle or any agents of the registered owner, unless the registered owner is a rental car agency, except upon presentation of evidence of financial responsibility, as defined in Section 16020, for the vehicle. The legal owner or the legal owner’s agent shall make every reasonable effort to ensure that the evidence of financial responsibility that is presented is valid.

(B) Prior to relinquishing the vehicle, the legal owner may require the registered owner to pay all towing and storage charges related to impoundment and any administrative charges authorized under Section 22850.5 that were incurred by the legal owner in connection with obtaining custody of the vehicle.

(4) A vehicle impounded under paragraph (1) shall be released to a rental car agency if the agency is either the legal owner or the registered owner of the vehicle and the agency pays all towing and storage fees related to the seizure of the vehicle.
